test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-suaja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - suaja: # Verb 'to receive / saada' - full paradigm
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suan
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: suat
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suau
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: suammo
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: suatto
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: suajah
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: sua
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3: suaja
 
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sain
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sait
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sai
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: saimmo
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: saitto
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: suadih
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: suannuh
      suaja+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: suadu
      
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg1:  suazin
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg2:  suazit
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg3:  suas
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl1:  suazimmo
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl2:  suazitto
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl3:  suadas
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: suas
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:  suadas

      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg1:  suannuzin
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg2:  suannuzit
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg3:  suannus
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl1:  suannuzimmo
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl2:  suannuzitto
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl3:  suadanus
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: suannus
      suaja+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3:  suadanus

      suaja+V+Act+Pot+Sg1:  suannen
      suaja+V+Act+Pot+Sg2:  suannet
      suaja+V+Act+Pot+Sg3:  suannou
      suaja+V+Act+Pot+Pl1:  suannemmo
      suaja+V+Act+Pot+Pl2:  suannetto
      suaja+V+Act+Pot+Pl3:  suadaneh
      suaja+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg: suanne
      suaja+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg+Pl3:  suadane

      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:  sua
      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+Sg3:  suagah
      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+Pl1:  suaguammo
      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [suagua, suaguatto]
      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:  suadahes
      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: sua
      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg3: suagah
      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl1: suaguammo
      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: suagua
      suaja+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl3: suadahes

      suaja+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: suaju
      suaja+V+Act+PrfPrc: suannuh
      suaja+V+Pss+PrsPrc: suadavu
      suaja+V+Pss+PrfPrc: suadu

      suaja+V+Inf: suaja
 
 
